Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1347
Agricultural or horticultural lands; special valuation; disqualification.

Upon approval of an application, the county assessor shall value the land as provided in section 77-1344 until the land becomes disqualified for such valuation by:

(1) Written notification by the applicant or his or her successor in interest to the county assessor to remove such special valuation;

(2) Inclusion of the land within the corporate boundaries of any sanitary and improvement district, city, or village, except that this subdivision shall not apply on or after January 1, 2023;

(3) The land no longer qualifying as agricultural or horticultural land; or

(4) For land that consists of less than five contiguous acres, the owner or lessee of the land not providing an Internal Revenue Service Schedule F or other suitable tax document reporting a profit or loss from farming for two out of the last three years.

Laws 1974, LB 359, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 26, § 4;

Laws 1985, LB 271, § 19;

Laws 1989, LB 361, § 12;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 53;

Laws 2001, LB 170, § 11;

Laws 2002, LB 994, § 18;

Laws 2005, LB 263, § 12;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 31;

Laws 2010, LB806, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB185, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 47;

Laws 2024, LB877, § 2.